Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle C. Contests of Other Elections.

§ 23-15-951.
Filing of petition; designation of judges to hear election contests; trial by, and verdict of, jury; assumption of office.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-955 or 23-15-961, a person desiring to contest the election of another person returned as elected to any office within any county, may, within twenty (20) days after the election, file a petition in the office of the clerk of the circuit court of the county, setting forth the grounds upon which the election is contested. When such a petition is filed, the circuit clerk shall immediately notify, by registered letter, telegraph, telephone, or personally the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or in his absence, or disability, some other Justice of the Supreme Court, who shall forthwith designate and notify a circuit judge or chancellor of a district other than that which embraces the district, subdistrict, county or any of the counties, involved in the contest or complaint, to proceed to the county in which the contest or complaint has been filed to hear and determine the contest or complaint. The circuit clerk shall also cause a copy of such petition to be served upon the contestee, which shall serve as notice to such contestee.

The Supreme Court shall compile a list of judges throughout the state to hear such disputes before an election. It shall be the official duty of the designated circuit judge or chancellor to proceed to discharge the duty of hearing the contest at the earliest possible date. The date of the contest shall be fixed by the judge or chancellor, and the judge or chancellor shall provide reasonable notice to the contestant and the contestee of the date and time fixed for the contest. The judge or chancellor shall cause the contestant and contestee to be served in a reasonable manner. When the contestee is served, such contestee shall promptly file his answer, and cross-complaint, if the contestee has a cross-complaint.

The court shall, at the first term, cause an issue to be made up and tried by a jury, and the verdict of the jury shall find the person having the greatest number of legal votes at the election. If the jury shall find against the person returned elected, the clerk shall issue a certificate thereof; and the person in whose favor the jury shall find shall be commissioned by the Governor, and shall qualify and enter upon the duties of his office. Each party shall be allowed ten (10) peremptory challenges, and new trials shall be granted and costs awarded as in other cases. In case the election of district attorney or other state district election be contested, the petition may be filed in any county of the district or in any county of an adjoining district within twenty (20) days after the election, and like proceedings shall be had thereon as in the case of county officers, and the person found to be entitled to the office shall qualify as required by law and enter upon the duties of his office.

A person desiring to contest the election of another person returned as elected to any seat in the Mississippi Legislature shall comply with the provisions of Section 23-15-955. A person desiring to contest the qualifications of a candidate for nomination in a political party primary election shall comply with the provisions of Section 23-15-961.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-187 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 7 (1); 1857, ch. 4, art 23; 1871, § 391; 1880, § 150; 1892, § 3679; 1906, § 4186; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6820; 1930, § 6258; 1942, § 3287; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 291; Laws, 1988, ch. 577, § 5; Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 13; Laws, 2000, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 432, § 1, eff October 22, 2013 (the date of the United States Attorney General’s response to the submission of this section under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

§ 23-15-953.
Proceedings with respect to petition filed more than forty days before term of circuit court next after contested election.

If the petition shall be filed more than forty (40) days before the term of the circuit court next after the election which is contested, the summons may be made returnable, and a trial of the issue be had in vacation, in the manner prescribed for a trial in vacation of an information in the nature of a quo warranto; and all of the provisions in reference to a trial in vacation of such proceedings shall apply to the trial of issues as to contested elections in the state of case herein mentioned; but this section shall not be held to include a contest of the election of a justice court judge, constable, coroner, surveyor, or member of a board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-189 [Codes, 1880, § 151; 1892, § 3680; 1906, § 4187; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6821; 1930, § 6259; 1942, § 3288; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 292, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-955.
Proceedings with respect to election of member of Senate or House of Representatives.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-961, the person contesting the seat of any member of the Senate or House of Representatives shall comply with the provisions of this section. Section 38, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, provides that each house of the Mississippi State Legislature shall judge the qualifications, return and election of its membership. Pursuant to that authority, the House of Representatives shall have exclusive jurisdiction over an election contest regarding the seat of any member of the House of Representatives, and the Senate shall have exclusive jurisdiction over an election contest regarding the seat of any member of the Senate. An election contest regarding the seat of a member of the House of Representatives or the Senate shall be filed with the Clerk of the House or the Secretary of the Senate, as the case may be, within thirty (30) days after a regular general election or ten (10) days after a special election to fill a vacancy. The legislative resolution of the election contest shall be conducted in accordance with procedures and precedents established by the House of Representatives or the Senate, as the case may be. Such procedures and precedents may be found in the Journals of the House of Representatives and of the State Senate and/or in the published Rules of the House of Representatives and of the State Senate.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-191 [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 21; 1871, § 389; 1880, § 148; 1892, § 3677; 1906, § 4184; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6818; 1930, § 6260; 1942, § 3289; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 293; Laws, 1988, ch. 577, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 450, § 2, eff from and after August 7, 2000 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-957.
Power to compel attendance of witnesses and production of documents.

Each house of the Legislature, the Clerk of the House of Representatives, the Secretary of the Senate, or any committee appointed to investigate the facts concerning the election or qualifications of any member or persons claimed to be such, shall have power to issue subpoenas and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of such documents or papers as may be required. In addition, the clerk or the secretary, as the case may be, shall have the authority to enforce any subpoena issued by him or her and to enforce compliance with the time limitations set forth in Section 23-15-955 or in any internal procedure or precedent of the respective house of the State Legislature.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-193 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (20); 1857, ch. 4, art 20; 1871, § 388; 1880, § 147; 1892, § 3678; 1906, § 4185; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6819; 1930, § 6261; 1942, § 3290; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 294; Laws, 2000, ch. 450, § 3, eff from and after August 7, 2000 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).